Washington statutes.
RCW 10.96.050

Recipients' immunity from liability.

A recipient of criminal process or process under RCW 10.96.010 and 10.96.040, and any other person that responds to such process is immune from civil and criminal liability for complying with the process, and for any failure to provide notice of any disclosure to the person who is the subject of or identified in the disclosure.

[ 2008 c 21 s 6.]